test/src/morphology/N-taem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täm: # Noun 101 'eng /est tamm ­e/fin' - full paradigm
     täm+N+Sg+Nom: täm
     täm+N+Sg+Gen: tam
     täm+N+Sg+Par: tammõ
     täm+N+Sg+Dat: tammõn
     täm+N+Sg+Ins: tammõks
     täm+N+Sg+Ill: tammõ
     täm+N+Sg+Ela: tamstõ
     täm+N+Pl+Nom: tǭmõd
     täm+N+Pl+Gen: tǭmõd
     täm+N+Pl+Par: tǭmidi
     täm+N+Pl+Dat: tǭmõdõn
     täm+N+Pl+Ins: tǭmõdõks
     täm+N+Pl+Ill: tǭmiž
     täm+N+Pl+Ela: tǭmist
